Nebraska, session 109, LB419.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 80-316, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
80-316 (1) The department shall provide long-term care domiciliary and
nursing home care and subsistence to:
(a) All persons who either served on active duty in the armed forces of
the United States, other than active duty for training, or served on active
duty for training in the Nebraska National Guard, including active duty for
training, and who were discharged or otherwise separated with a
characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions) if, at
the time of making an application for admission to one of the Nebraska veterans
homes:
(i) The applicant has been a bona fide resident of the State of Nebraska
for at least two years; and
(ii) The applicant is in need of long-term care available at one of the
Nebraska veterans homes; has become disabled due to service, old age, or
otherwise to an extent that it would prevent such applicant from earning a
livelihood; and
(iii) The applicant's income from all sources is such that the applicant
would be dependent wholly or partially upon public charities for support or the
type of care needed is available only at a state institution;
(b) The spouse of any such person admitted to one of the homes who has
attained the age of fifty years and has been married to such member for at
least two years before his or her entrance into the home;
(c) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the surviving spouses and
parents of eligible servicemen and servicewomen as defined in subdivision (a)
of this subsection who died while in the service of the United States or who
have since died of a service-connected disability as determined by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs; and
(d) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the surviving spouses of
eligible servicemen or servicewomen as defined in subdivision (a) of this
subsection who have since died.
(2) The surviving spouses and parents referred to in subdivision (1)(c) or
(d) of this section shall be eligible for such care and subsistence if, at the
time of applying, they:
(a) Have been bona fide residents of the State of Nebraska for at least
two years; and
(b) Have attained the age of fifty years;
(b) (c) Are unable to earn a livelihood. ; and
(d) Are dependent wholly or partially upon public charities or the type of
care needed is available only at a state institution.
(3) No one admitted to one of the Nebraska veterans homes under conditions
enumerated in this section shall have a vested right to continued residence in
such home if such person ceases to meet any of the eligibility requirements of
this section, except that no person who has been regularly admitted shall be
denied continued residence solely because of his or her marriage to a member of
one of the homes.
Sec. 2. Section 80-401.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
80-401.03 (1) The Director of Veterans' Affairs shall be responsible for
the administration of the income funds from the Nebraska Veterans' Aid Fund for
the aid of needy veterans and their dependents.
(2) The Director of Veterans' Affairs, the deputy director, or a designee
of the director shall receive and approve for payment or disapprove
applications for aid which shall originate with in any local post service
officer of any recognized veterans organization, or with a county veterans
service officer, or with a state service officer. An applicant may only submit
one claim within any thirty-day period, except that there may be an additional
application for funeral expenses. If there are two or more local posts of one
or more recognized veterans organizations in any community, no claimant can
originate a claim in more than one such post at any given time and a period of
at least thirty days shall elapse between the filing of claims. An application
shall not be deemed to be filed until it has been received and filed in the
office of the Director of Veterans' Affairs. The director may adopt and
promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary for administering
such aid.
(3) No part of the interest accumulation of the Nebraska Veterans' Aid
-1-

LB419 LB419
2025 2025
Fund shall be expended for the purpose of organizing and maintaining any
veterans organization. There shall be expended under the direction of the
Director of Veterans' Affairs such sum or sums as may be specifically
appropriated by the Legislature for the employment of necessary assistants or
deputies and clerical employees at such reasonable compensation as may be fixed
by the director in each particular case and for the maintenance and expenses of
a state service office with necessary service officers and assistants to
prepare and present meritorious cases of ex-servicemen and ex-servicewomen for
benefits before the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. Such cases
shall be accepted by the state service officer on behalf of any claimant when a
proper power of attorney is given by such claimant to the office of the
Director of Veterans' Affairs or to a state service officer, if he or she is so
designated by any recognized veterans organization as its sole representative,
and regardless of where the cases originate. No part of such sum or sums is to
be paid out of the twelve-million-dollar trust fund or the income therefrom.
Upon the completion of the trust, the principal fund so held by the State
Treasurer shall revert to the treasury of the state.
(4) For purposes of this section, veteran means any person who:
(a) Served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, other
than active duty for training, and who:
(i) Was discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of
honorable or general (under honorable conditions) from such service; or
(ii) Died while in service or as a direct result of such service; or
(b) Being a citizen of the United States at the time of his or her entry
into such service, served with the military forces of any government allied
with the United States during any period identified in section 80-401.01 and
was discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or
general (under honorable conditions).
Sec. 3. Original sections 80-316 and 80-401.03, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, are repealed.
-2-